District of Columbia statutes.
28-3307

Council of the District of Columbia authorized to exempt certain mortgages and loans.

The Council of the District of Columbia is authorized from time to time to provide by regulation for the exemption from the provisions of this chapter of any mortgage or loan insured or guaranteed under the National Housing Act or Chapter 37 of Title 38, United States Code, the interest rate of which is subject to regulation by an officer or agency of the Federal Government. The Council is further authorized to amend or repeal any such regulation at any time, but no such amendment or repeal shall affect any such loan or mortgage lawfully made or committed to be made while such exemption is in effect.

Aug. 20, 1970, 84 Stat. 828, Pub. L. 91-385, § 2(a)
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 27(d), 44 DCR 1271
1981 Ed., § 28-3307.
1973 Ed., § 28-3307.
The National Housing Act, referred to in the first sentence of this section, is codified in 12 U.S.C. § 1701 et seq.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.